Washington statutes.
RCW 32.35.030

Investigation.

When the notice of intention to organize and proposed articles of incorporation complying with RCW 32.35.020 have been received by the director, together with the fees required by law, the director shall ascertain from the best source of information at his or her command and by such investigation as he or she may deem necessary, whether the character, responsibility and general fitness of the persons named in the articles are such as to command confidence and warrant belief that the business of the proposed stock savings bank will be honestly and efficiently conducted in accordance with the intent and purpose of this title, whether the resources in the neighborhood of such place and in the surrounding country afford a reasonable promise of adequate support for the proposed stock savings bank, and whether the proposed stock savings bank is being formed for other than the legitimate objects covered by this title.

[ 1999 c 14 s 3.]